Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.725

Youth and young adults exiting publicly funded system of care—System of care grants.

(1) Subject to the amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the office of homeless youth prevention and protection programs shall provide system of care grants that prevent youth from exiting a publicly funded system of care into homelessness.

(2) The system of care grants funded under this section shall provide support to youth exiting a publicly funded system of care and may include:

(a) Behavioral health services;

(b) Civil legal aid;

(c) Peer navigators and support;

(d) Family reconciliation or engagement services;

(e) Employment support;

(f) Education support;

(g) Case management;

(h) Housing and financial support; or

(i) Other navigation support to secure safe and stable housing.

(3) For purposes of this section, "publicly funded system of care" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 43.330.720.

[ 2022 c 137 s 5.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—2022 c 137: See note following RCW 43.330.723.